hunspell/test.aff
###############################
### start of Māori aff file ###
###############################

######################
#### part 1 of 3 #####
### basic settings ###
######################

##### set #####
SET UTF-8
### end set ###

##### try #####
TRY a
### end try ###

##### key #####
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm
### end key ###

##### rep #####
REP 6
REP n ng
REP ng n
REP w wh
REP wh w
REP burp-factory burp_factory
REP kare_ā_roto kare_ā-roto
### end rep ###

##### maxngramsugs #####
MAXNGRAMSUGS 0
### end maxngramsugs ###

##### break #####
BREAK 0
### end break ###

##### fullstrip #####
FULLSTRIP
### end fullstrip ###

NOSPLITSUGS

##### flag #####
FLAG num
### end flag ###

########################
##### part 2 of 3 ######
### regular suffixes ###
########################

##### 001 of 140 #####
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 a
### end 001 of 140 ###

##########################
###### part 3 of 3 #######
### irregular suffixes ###
##########################

##### 002 of 140 #####
SFX 2 N 2
SFX 2 brown spingle .
SFX 2 brown spangle .
### end 002 of 140 ###

#############################
### end of Māori aff file ###
#############################
